District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.08

Delegation of Council authority to issue bonds.

The Council delegates to the Authority the power of the Council under section 490 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act (§ 1-204.90) to issue revenue bonds to finance, refinance, or assist in the financing or refinancing of any undertakings of the Authority pursuant to this chapter.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 208, 43 DCR 548
Section 701 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that the act, with the exception of sections 208 through 211, shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), approval by the Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority as provided in section 203(a) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority Act of 1995, approved April 17, 1995 (109 Stat. 116; D.C. Code § 47-392.03(c)), and a 30-day period of Congressional review as provided in section 602 (c)(1) of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register. Sections 208 through 211 of the act shall take effect upon the enactment by Congress of the legislation proposed in title IV of the act, or of substantially similar legislation.
1981 Ed., § 43-1678.
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.03.